Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Miscellaneous Health Coverage Provisions
205.6310.
Cabinet to establish system to reduce unnecessary hospital emergency room utilization and costs.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall establish a system within the Medical Assistance Program to reduce unnecessary hospital emergency room utilization and costs by redefining and controlling hospital emergency utilization. The cabinet shall establish by promulgation of administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, the following:

Criteria and procedures, at least annually updated, that differentiate children and adults, and which conform to the Federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act (42 U.S.C. sec. 1395dd), as amended, and any other applicable federal law or regulation for determining if a medical emergency exists;

Reimbursement rates that provide for nominal reimbursement of emergency room care for care that does not meet the criteria established for a medical emergency;

Reimbursement, at rates determined by the cabinet, for ancillary services which, based upon the symptoms of the patient, are medically appropriate to determine if a medical emergency exists;

Except for emergency room services rendered to children under the age of six (6), prohibition of reimbursement at hospital emergency room rates for diagnosis and treatment for a condition that does not meet the criteria established for a medical emergency; and

The provisions of this section shall apply to any managed care program for Medicaid recipients.

The cabinet or its designated peer review organization shall review all claims for payment of nonemergency hospital care and deny payment for any ancillary services determined as not medically appropriate.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 72, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 206, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 248, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6311.
Substance use disorder treatment benefit — Administrative regulations — Contracts with Medicaid managed care organizations — Annual report.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall provide a substance use disorder benefit consistent with federal laws and regulations which shall include a broad array of treatment options for those with heroin and other substance use disorders.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement this section and to expand the behavioral health network to allow providers to provide services within their licensure category.

Providers of peer-mediated, recovery-oriented, therapeutic community models of care shall have the opportunity to contract with managed care organizations to be reimbursed for any portion of those services that are provided by licensed or certified providers in accordance with approved billing codes.

A Medicaid managed care organization shall:

Authorize treatment for each diagnosis related to substance use disorder and co-occurring mental health and substance use disorder covered by Medicaid that is identified within the most updated edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders issued by the American Psychiatric Association that meets the criteria for medical necessity and level of care; and

Approve coverage and payment for continuing care at the appropriate level of care.

Beginning January 1, 2016, the Department for Medicaid Services shall provide an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission detailing the number of providers of substance use disorder treatment, the type of services offered by each provider, the geographic distribution of providers, and a summary of expenditures on substance use disorder treatment services provided by Medicaid.

HISTORY:
2015 ch. 66, § 5, effective March 25, 2015.

205.6312.
Prohibit charging medical recipients copayments or cost sharing.

Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, the cabinet or a managed care organization contracted by the cabinet to provide Medicaid services pursuant to this chapter shall not institute copayments, cost sharing, or similar charges to be paid by any medical assistance recipients, their spouses, or parents, for any assistance provided pursuant to this chapter, federal law, or any federal Medicaid waiver.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 73, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 371, § 30, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 46, § 1, effective March 12, 2003; 2021 ch. 62, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

205.6313.
Medicaid reimbursement for primary care practitioners at community mental health centers.

For the purposes of this section:

“Advanced practice registered nurse” has the same meaning as in KRS 314.011;

“Physician” has the same meaning as in KRS 311.550; and

“Physician assistant” has the same meaning as in KRS 311.840.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services and any regional managed care partnership or other entity under contract with the cabinet for the administration or provision of the Medicaid program shall provide Medicaid reimbursement for primary care services provided by a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant employed by a community mental health center established pursuant to KRS 210.370 to 210.480, if the community mental health center is in compliance with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services regulations on enhanced primary care reimbursements.

Primary care services provided by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant in a community mental health center shall be subject to the same reimbursement rates as established by the Department for Medicaid Services for primary care providers operating in Kentucky.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 124, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

205.6314.
Review of reimbursement rates for emergency transportation providers — Promulgation of administrative regulations relating to emergency transportation providers.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall review the Medical Assistance Program reimbursement rates for emergency transportation providers to determine if existing rates are fair and reasonable. Notwithstanding this review, the cabinet shall by promulgation of administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, do the following:

Prescribe reimbursement rates for emergency transportation providers to ensure that emergency rates are paid only for transporting medical assistance recipients to the emergency room of a hospital in emergency situations;

Establish, in nonemergency cases, lower medical assistance reimbursement rates for emergency transportation providers for the transportation of stretcher patients from nursing homes to physician offices or hospitals; and

Establish a verification system that requires medical providers to confirm that medical assistance recipients have appointments for medical services and that medical services were medically necessary and were obtained prior to payment by the cabinet to the emergency transportation provider.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 74, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 207, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 249, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6315.
Requirements when private peer review organization is contracted with to conduct reviews of levels of care.

When the cabinet contracts with any private peer review organization to conduct utilization reviews of the levels of care of the state’s Medicaid program recipients, the following shall apply:

In determining the appropriate level of care of a Medicaid beneficiary who is a patient in a nursing facility setting, and prior to any change that reduces a Medicaid beneficiary’s eligibility for covered services, the contracted peer review organization shall assure that:

An in-person assessment of the Medicaid beneficiary is made; and

A licensed physician has reviewed the written documentation of the peer review organization’s evaluation and provided a written review of the evaluation to be a part of the patient’s record.

If the level of care is changed for a Medicaid beneficiary who is a resident or patient in a nursing facility setting or a Medicaid beneficiary who receives community-based waiver services, and the change makes that beneficiary ineligible for the Medicaid covered service, the peer review organization shall notify the commissioner of Medicaid in the cabinet, and shall provide a written notification sent by registered return receipt mail to the affected Medicaid beneficiary, nursing facility, affected Medicaid beneficiary’s attending physician, and the affected beneficiary’s responsible party.

If the level of care for a Medicaid beneficiary results in an adverse determination, the affected Medicaid beneficiary, or the responsible person or party, may appeal through an application for reconsideration to be filed with the cabinet within ten (10) days from the date of receipt of the registered return receipt written notification. If the responsible party’s registered return receipt mail is undeliverable, the attending physician may initiate the appeal on behalf of the affected Medicaid beneficiary.

All benefits which the affected Medicaid recipient, and the nursing facility are eligible for shall be continued during that ten (10) day time frame; and

As long as the affected Medicaid recipient is engaged in an appeal of an adverse determination from a peer review organization, all benefits for which the affected Medicaid recipient and nursing facility are eligible shall be continued until an appropriate residential setting is secured, in any event, not to exceed ninety (90) days from the date of the request for a hearing, or until a final determination is made by a hearing officer.

If the level of care is lowered for a Medicaid beneficiary who is a resident or patient in a nursing facility setting, an independent examination may be conducted by the resident’s attending physician.
(4) (a)

If the level of care is lowered for a Medicaid beneficiary who is a resident or patient in a nursing facility setting, an independent examination may be conducted by the resident’s attending physician.

If the resident’s attending physician conducts an independent examination, the attending physician shall make a recommendation concerning the appropriate level of care and forward, in writing, the results of the examination and the recommendation to the peer review organization, the affected recipient, the nursing facility, and the responsible party.

For the purposes of this section, “responsible person or party” shall mean an individual authorized by the resident of the facility to act for the resident as an official delegate or agent. The responsible person may be a guardian, payee, family member, or any other individual who has arranged for the care of the resident and assumed this responsibility. The responsible party may or may not be related to the resident. A responsible person or party is not a guardian unless so appointed by the court.

The peer review organization shall:

Inform the patient and guardian, responsible party, or family member, upon initial qualification for Medicaid covered services, and with the written notification of an adverse determination from a peer review organization:

Of the manner in which notification of any adverse decision will be made;

Of the process for securing a timely review of any adverse decision;

That a request for reconsideration must be postmarked no later than ten (10) days after receipt of the initial written notification of any adverse decision;

Of the toll-free line that will be provided for questions regarding reviews; and

Of the process for appealing an adverse reconsideration to the cabinet;

Provide a written peer review organization physician review of all adverse determinations;

Provide for an attending physician review of all adverse determinations as outlined in subsection (4) of this section;

Inform the commissioner of all information related to an appeal of an adverse action; and

Provide the information identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection, at the time of an adverse determination notification, to any affected nursing facility in which a Medicaid beneficiary resides.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

205.6316.
Review of procedures for medical assistance reimbursement of pharmacists to reduce fraud and abuse — Dispensing fee.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall review the procedures for medical assistance reimbursement of pharmacists to reduce fraud and abuse. The cabinet shall by promulgation of administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, establish the following:

Point-of-sale computer technology, with integration of data at the physician’s office and the pharmacy, that will permit prospective drug utilization review;

Usage parameters by drug class to enable medical necessity and appropriateness reviews to be conducted prior to payment;

A dialog among the Department for Medicaid Services, the Kentucky Medical Board of Licensure, and the Kentucky Board of Pharmacy, to develop recommendations for legislation for the 1996 Regular Session of the General Assembly that will strengthen the generic substitution laws for prescription medication; and

A dispensing fee for each prescription.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 75, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 208, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 521, § 29, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 8, § 2, effective February 21, 2002; 2004, ch. 108, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 250, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6317.
Department for Medicaid Services to develop strategies for reimbursing and paying persons participating in the Supports for Community Living Waiver Program — Allocation of slots — Administrative regulations — Funding.

As used in this section:

“Supports for Community Living Waiver Program” means funding from the Department for Medicaid Services to serve individuals with an intellectual disability or other developmental disabilities who qualify for intermediate care and choose to live in a community-based setting and includes funding for a self-determination model that provides the ability for the individual receiving services and supports to personally control, with appropriate assistance, a targeted amount of dollars; and

“Slots” means the dedication of provider or financial resources for services to persons with an intellectual disability or other developmental disabilities.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall develop and implement flexible reimbursement and payment strategies that reflect the individually determined needs for services and supports by persons with an intellectual disability and other developmental disabilities participating in the Supports for Community Living Waiver Program.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall allocate slots to the fourteen (14) community mental health regions based on percentage of total population.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall reallocate underutilized slots to address statewide needs and shall reallocate slots in emergency situations to address unmet needs for services and supports.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the requirements of this section.

Funds for the Supports for Community Living Waiver Program shall be appropriated only for direct services to qualified individuals and any unexpended funds shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and shall be used for the same purpose.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 403, § 4, effective April 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 162, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 141, § 13, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 64, effective July 12, 2012; 2020 ch. 36, § 39, effective July 15, 2020.

205.63171.
Short title for KRS 205.6317.

KRS 205.6317 may be cited as the Kevin Webb and Kim Brown Self-Determination Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 108, § 3, effective June 24, 2003.

205.6318.
Cabinet to establish integrated system to enhance program integrity of Medical Assistance Program.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall review the available technology associated with the medical assistance system to determine which technology is best suited to enhance program service operation, monitoring ability, and fraud and abuse detection. This shall include the ability to provide on-line access to data files to allow cross-analysis of provider and recipient utilization patterns. The cabinet shall by promulgation of administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, establish an integrated system to enhance program integrity, using a combination of staff, computer technology, and contractual services to identify potential fraud, abuse, and misutilization of services. This system shall:

Utilize statisticians, program specialists, accountants, nurses, and other medical specialists to review the Medical Assistance Program to identify patterns of provider and recipient behavior that contributes to unnecessary or abusive use of program services;

Utilize computer capability through contractual services or the purchase of computer software to detect the unbundling of claims and other techniques used by providers to enhance reimbursement;

Impose utilization controls on the expenditures in respiratory, physical, speech, and occupational therapy and durable medical equipment provided to nursing-home residents, through the use of established medical criteria or preauthorization of ancillary therapies;

Establish state audit and edit requirements that exceed the federal audit and edit requirements;

Obtain access to necessary data from the fiscal agent of each medical provider;

Review the efficiency and effectiveness of the fraud and abuse detection and investigation process to determine whether changes shall be made;

Direct that fraud and abuse detection and investigation components shall be active in initiating investigations. The fraud and abuse detection, investigation, and prosecution functions shall be integrated, with access to information in files maintained by the Department for Community Based Services and the Department for Medicaid Services;

Review penalties for deterrent value for medical providers that are found to have abused Medicaid regulations and statutes; and

Provide for a proactive effort to reduce costs for institutionalized program participants. Program officials shall seek to implement innovative or experimental demonstration programs that aim to control costs.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 76, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 209, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 33, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 251, effective June 20, 2005.

205.632.
Pilot project to create coverage provisions and reimbursement criteria for telemonitoring services based on evidence-based best practices provided by a qualified medical provider or community action agency.

As used in this section:

“Department” means the Department for Medicaid Services;

“Evidence-based best practices” means the integration of the best available research with clinical expertise in the context of patient characteristics and patient and family caregiver preferences;

“Qualified medical provider” means a credentialed and enrolled Medicaid-participating healthcare provider, hospital, rural health center, or licensed home health agency as defined in KRS 216.935; and

“Telemonitoring services” means services that require scheduled remote monitoring of data related to a patient’s health where the monitoring is conducted at the patient’s place of residence or other site determined by the department.

Not later than July 1, 2017, the department shall establish a pilot project in which it creates coverage provisions and reimbursement criteria for telemonitoring services based on evidence-based best practices provided by a qualified medical provider or a community action agency as defined in KRS 273.410.

In order to effectuate the pilot project, the department may:

Submit a state plan amendment, waiver, or waiver amendment for approval to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in order to provide coverage for medically necessary telemonitoring services performed for a Medicaid beneficiary;

Request funding from the General Assembly to support telemonitoring services rendered by a qualified medical provider or a community action agency under this section;

Ensure that clinical information gathered by a qualified medical provider or a community action agency while providing telemonitoring services is shared with the patient’s treating health care professionals; and

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for the implementation and administration of this section.

HISTORY:
2016 ch. 126, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

205.6320.
Cabinet to strengthen managed care component of KenPAC Program and to establish standards for access and quality for organizations serving Medicaid recipients.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall seek to strengthen the managed care component of the KenPAC Program. The cabinet shall by promulgation of administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, establish the following:

Inclusion of noninstitutionalized blind, aged, and disabled recipients in an effort to reduce inappropriate usage as permitted by federal Medicaid regulations;

Financial incentives for KenPAC physicians who effectively manage the care of their patients. These incentives may include an increase in the case management fee for demonstrated effective case management, or through other arrangements that encourage the effective and efficient management of patients. Clear and concise administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A shall be established by the cabinet to determine physician qualification for the incentives;

A pilot project to establish an oversight and education program in the KenPAC system to assist with patient education regarding the appropriate and effective use of the system and to assist providers with more efficient management of patients;

Criteria to avoid duplication of the provision of early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment-type services to children in the KenPAC Program;

A review of the feasibility of a demonstration project to allow health maintenance organizations to bid on the provision of services to KenPAC participants;

Extension of KenPAC to all counties within the state. The cabinet shall determine the feasibility of working with state-supported medical schools to obtain physicians in the counties where KenPAC does not operate; and

More stringent reporting and verification requirements in contracts with KenPAC physicians regarding verification of services provided to KenPAC patients.

The secretary shall promulgate by administrative regulation standards for access and quality which any health maintenance organizations serving Medicaid recipients shall meet. The secretary shall not provide Medicaid services through a health maintenance organization which does not demonstrate the capacity to meet the standards. The standards shall address at least the following subjects:

Access to care including patient to physician ratios, availability of appropriate specialists, distance to care, travel and waiting times, and physical and language barriers;

Internal and external methods for monitoring quality of care;

Data collection and reporting, including provision of data on utilization, outcomes, enrollee satisfaction, and the number, type, and resolution of grievances and complaints, with subpopulation data for at-risk populations;

Due-process procedures including written notice of appeal rights, timelines for resolution of complaints, and expedited appeals processes;

Consumer representation and patient advocacy; and

Marketing practices including prohibited practices and standards for advertisements and printed marketing materials.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 77, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 371, § 31, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 210, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 252, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6322.
Cabinet to seek to prohibit sheltering of assets in long-term-care cases.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall seek to prohibit the sheltering of assets in medical assistance long-term-care cases by promulgation of administrative regulations, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, that establish the following:

Consideration of assets placed in Medicaid-qualifying trusts as a prohibited transfer of resources, to the extent prohibited by federal law;

Revision of Medicaid policy to provide that assets funding the purchase of an annuity shall be treated as a transfer of resources unless the annuity is actuarially sound as defined in administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;

Revision of Medicaid policy to treat income-producing property as an available resource to the extent allowed by federal law;

Review of Medicaid eligibility procedures and operation to improve eligibility verification and detection of fraud and abuse; and

Review of the feasibility of instituting a photographic identification card, possibly in conjunction with other entitlement programs, to reduce fraud and abuse through misuse of Medicaid identification cards.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 78, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 371, § 32, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 211, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 253, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6324.
Cabinet to enhance third-party resource collection capacity.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall by promulgation of administrative regulations enhance third-party resource collection capacity in Medicaid cases through utilization of in-house personnel and selective contracting for high-volume or high-technological services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 79, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 212, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 254, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6326.
Review of Medicaid reimbursement systems — Implementation of a standardized patient assessment tool and consistent quality-of-care mandates.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall review all medical assistance reimbursement systems for appropriateness and cost-effectiveness. The review shall include:

Review of cost-based reimbursement policies for hospitals and nursing homes to determine the effectiveness and appropriateness of alternate systems. Consideration shall be given to the use of modified diagnostic-related groups and resource utilization groups systems, using capitated payment methods; and

Review of reimbursement rates for physicians to determine whether savings or cost containment would be better achieved through using a relative-based resource value scale system, a capitated payment method, or other alternative methods of reimbursement; and

For all Medicaid-covered long-term-care services, implementation of a standardized patient assessment tool and consistent quality-of-care mandates.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 80, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 213, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 255, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6328.
Quarterly reports to General Assembly regarding Medicaid program changes — Expiration provision. [Expired]

The Cabinet for Human Resources shall establish a system for the reporting to the General Assembly, on a quarterly basis, through December 31, 1996, as to the progress in implementing the provisions of KRS 205.6310 to 205.6332, the findings of any reports or studies authorized by KRS 205.6310 to 205.6332, and recommendations regarding the reports or studies.

As each item identified in subsection (1) of this section has been completed, that item shall not be included on the next quarterly report, but shall be identified as having been completed.

This section expires on January 1, 1997.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 81, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 371, § 34, effective July 15, 1996.

205.6330.
Promotion of access to preventive health services by low-income Kentuckians through local health departments — Cabinet to establish program as a provider of last resort. [Repealed.]

205.6332.
System for monitoring use of covered services using appropriate technology and identification card.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall develop and implement a system for monitoring the use of Medical Assistance Program covered services by medical assistance recipients using appropriate technology in conjunction with an identification card to monitor recipient utilization of the following services at the option of the commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services:

All drugs and durable medical equipment prescribed for and dispensed to the recipient;

All medical-assistance-covered physician office visits made by the recipient; and

Any other Medical Assistance Program covered service provided to the medical assistance recipient as defined by administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A and under this chapter.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 83, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 371, § 33, effective July 15, 1996.

205.6333.
Reimbursement for in-network suppliers of durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies — Reimbursement rate — Timeframe for claim submissions.

As used in this section, “durable medical equipment” means equipment which:
(1) (a)

As used in this section, “durable medical equipment” means equipment which:

Can withstand repeated use;

Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;

Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of an illness or injury; and

Is appropriate for use in the home.

As used in this section, “durable medical equipment” does not include:

Enteral nutrition;

Eye prosthetics;

Home infusion;

Orthotics;

Prosthetics; or

Automated external defibrillators under Healthcare Common Procedure Codes K0606 and E0617.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall reimburse a supplier of durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies at no less than ninety percent (90%) of the state Medicaid program durable medical equipment fee schedule and shall require Medicaid managed care organizations to reimburse the same amount as the Department for Medicaid Services reimburses for the same service or item of durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies. This subsection shall apply to those healthcare codes and services included in Section 1903(i)(27) of Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

The department shall require Medicaid managed care organizations to reimburse suppliers of durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies for manually priced items in the Medicaid program durable medical equipment fee schedule at the manufacturer’s suggested retail price minus eighteen percent (18%) pricing where there is a manufacturer’s suggested retail price, and at invoice price plus twenty percent (20%) for miscellaneous Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes where there is no manufacturer’s suggested retail price.

The department shall require Medicaid managed care organizations to cover, at a minimum, the same Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System codes and the same quantities of medical supplies, equipment, or services as are established on the Kentucky Medicaid program durable medical equipment fee schedule or Kentucky Medicaid medical policy.

The department shall ensure that the allowable timeframe for claim submissions by suppliers of durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies shall equal the timeframe allowed for any discrepancy during the Medicaid managed care organization audit or recoupment process for that claim.

The reimbursement for suppliers of durable medical equipment established pursuant to this section shall only be available to a durable medical equipment supplier who is an in-network provider of the beneficiary’s Medicaid managed care organization.

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 176, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

205.6334.
Request for necessary waivers of federal law.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall request any waivers of federal law that are necessary to implement the provisions of KRS 205.6310 to 205.6332.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 84, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 214, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 256, effective June 20, 2005.

205.6336.
Certification to Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue of general fund savings realized from procedures adopted to control health-care costs — Transfer of savings to trust fund. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 92, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 215, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 34, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 53, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 146, § 65, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 29, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

205.6338.
Implementation of pilot projects to provide health care to frail elderly Medicaid-eligible individuals.

Within one (1) year of obtaining necessary waivers from the Federal Health Care Financing Administration, the Secretary of the Cabinet for Health Services shall take all necessary steps to implement from one (1) to three (3) pilot projects to provide health-care services to frail elderly Medicaid-eligible individuals through fully integrated managed-care systems for the elderly similar to the Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) program currently being replicated on a national basis with the approval of Congress.

Within ninety (90) days of July 15, 1994, the Secretary of the Cabinet for Health Services shall request the appropriate waivers from the Federal Health Care Financing Administration to implement a PACE program or a similar program in Kentucky.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, § 116, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 216, effective July 15, 1998.

205.634.
Payments prohibited to out-of-state health facility providing services without required certificate of need — Nonreimbursement of out-of-state providers of residential care for children — Exception — Administrative regulations.

No medical assistance payments shall be made under this chapter to any out-of-state health facility or health service providing services within the geographic boundaries of the Commonwealth who does not have a certificate of need if the health facility or health service would be required to obtain a certificate of need under KRS Chapter 216B if the facility or service were located within the geographic boundaries of the Commonwealth.

The Department for Medicaid Services and the Department for Community Based Services shall not reimburse an out-of-state provider of residential care for children whose care is paid by state general funds or state administered federal funds, unless the Department for Medicaid Services or the Department for Community Based Services or a designated agent thereof has determined that there is no provider within the Commonwealth that is capable and willing to provide comparable services at a comparable cost per child to those that would be delivered by the out-of-state provider. An exception may be made if:

The identified in-state resource is farther away from the child’s parent or guardian than a similar out-of-state resource; or

The services offered by the out-of-state resource is deemed by either department or a designated agent thereof to be more appropriate for the individual child than the services offered by the in-state provider.

Prior to promulgating administrative regulations governing the determination of the availability of providers of residential care within the Commonwealth, the Department for Medicaid Services and the Department for Community Based Services shall establish uniform conditions, requirements, and exceptions for the determination of the availability of providers of residential care within the Commonwealth.

Each department shall promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that contains the uniform conditions, requirements, and exceptions for the determination of the availability of providers of residential care within the Commonwealth established under subsection (3) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 371, § 35, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 527, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 35, effective July 14, 2000.

205.635.
Skilled nursing services provided to Medicaid recipients by adult day health care programs.

An adult day health care program shall be required to provide skilled nursing services to Medicaid recipients only during the posted hours of operation.

History.
Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 277, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 295, § 2, effective April 9, 2002.

205.636.
Temporary COVID-19 personal care attendant — Training and competency requirements — Application for waiver or plan amendment.

As used in this section:

“COVID-19 pandemic” means the national emergency declaration concerning COVID-19 as declared by the President of the United States and the United States Department of Health and Human Services; and

“Temporary COVID-19 personal care attendant” or “PCA” means a person who is employed and received training in a skilled nursing facility under a temporary accommodation made to address work load increases and staffing shortages caused by the COVID-19 pandemic by the suspension of federal regulatory and statutory provisions by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall accept the training requirements as included in the “Temporary COVID-19 Personal Care Attendant memorandum” issued April 14, 2020, by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services that are completed by a PCA who is in good standing with his or her employer. The PCA shall be deemed a state registered nurse aide and shall be placed on the Kentucky Nurse Aide Registry if:

A minimum of eighty (80) hours of PCA duties have been completed within a skilled nursing facility under the supervision of a licensed or registered nurse; and

Competency has been established by the following:

Through an assessment in all areas of required nurse aide training as provided for in 42 C.F.R. sec. 483.152(b) by an instructor who is a licensed nurse confirmed by the facility to have completed instructor training required by the Department for Medicaid Services; and

Successful completion of the nurse aide examination.

The Department for Medicaid Services shall:

Apply for any Medicaid waivers or state plan amendments necessary to implement subsection (2) of this section;

Incorporate the provisions under subsection (2) of this section into the nurse aide training and competency evaluation program requirements; and

Promulgate any administration regulation necessary to implement this subsection and subsection (2) of this section.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 58, § 1, effective March 22, 2021; 2021 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 8, effective September 9, 2021.